test/src/morphology/N-suhvli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - suhvli: # Noun 'laatikko'
     suhvli+N+Sg+Nom: suhvli
     suhvli+N+Sg+Gen: suhvli
     suhvli+N+Sg+Par: suhvlit
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ill: suhvlihe
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ine: suhvlin
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ela: suhvlist
     suhvli+N+Sg+All: suhvlilõ
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ade: suhvlil
     suhvli+N+Sg+Abl: suhvlilt
     suhvli+N+Sg+Tra: suhvlis
     suhvli+N+Sg+Ter: suhvliniq
     suhvli+N+Sg+Abe: suhvlildaq
     suhvli+N+Sg+Kom: suhvligaq

     suhvli+N+Pl+Nom: suhvliq
     suhvli+N+Pl+Gen: suhvlidõ
     suhvli+N+Pl+Par: suhvliid
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ill: suhvliihe
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ine: suhvliin
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ela: suhvliist
     suhvli+N+Pl+All: suhvliilõ
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ade: suhvliil
     suhvli+N+Pl+Abl: suhvliilt
     suhvli+N+Pl+Tra: suhvliis
     suhvli+N+Pl+Ter: suhvliiniq
     suhvli+N+Pl+Abe: suhvliildaq
     suhvli+N+Pl+Kom: suhvliigaq
